Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.130

Pay for actual student success (PASS) program—Created—Finding—Collaboration.

(1) The pay for actual student success (PASS) program is created under this section and RCW 28A.175.135 through 28A.175.160 to invest in proven dropout prevention and intervention programs as provided in RCW 28A.175.135 and provide a financial award for high schools that demonstrate improvement in the dropout prevention indicators established under RCW 28A.175.140. The legislature finds that increased accumulation of credits and reductions in incidents of student discipline lead to improved graduation rates.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the *building bridges working group, the student achievement council, and the college scholarship organization under RCW 28A.175.135(4) shall collaborate to assure that the programs under RCW 28A.175.135 operate systematically and are expanded to include as many additional students and schools as possible.

[ 2012 c 229 s 503; 2011 c 288 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "building bridges work group" was renamed the "graduation: a team effort partnership advisory committee" by 2020 c 114 s 2.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.